Utah statutes.
48-2a-802.   Judicial dissolution.

On application by or for a partner or the director of the division, a district court having competent jurisdiction may decree dissolution of the limited partnership whenever it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the partnership agreement or for failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 1990 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

